Hawaii statutes.
§487-9 Investigations. The director in
the course of the director's investigations may subpoena witnesses, examine
them under oath, and require the production of books, papers, documents, or
objects which the director deems relevant to the investigation. Service of the
subpoena may be made personally within this State, but if personal service
cannot be obtained, substituted service may be made on any witness over whom
the courts can exercise jurisdiction pursuant to chapter 634, in the following
manner:

(1) Personal service outside the State;

(2) Mailing by registered or certified mail to the
last known place of business, residence, or abode within or without this State
of the person to be served;

(3) As to any person other than a natural person, in
the manner provided in the Hawaii rules of civil procedure as if a complaint
had been filed; or

(4) Such service as the circuit court may direct in
lieu of personal service within this State.

Upon application by the director, obedience to the
subpoena may be enforced by the circuit courts of this State in the county
where the person subpoenaed resides or is found in the same manner as a
subpoena issued by the clerk of a circuit court. If the person is a
nonresident or has no principal place of business within this State, obedience
to the subpoena may also be enforced by a circuit court of this State in the
county where the subpoena was issued. The director may conduct hearings in aid
of any investigation or inquiry, and may prescribe forms and adopt rules as may
be necessary in the interest of the consumer public. [L 1969, c 175, §9; am L
1976, c 94, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1998, c 200, §1]

Cross References

Hearings, see chapter 91.

Rules of Court

Service of process, see HRCP rule 4.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next